Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1072.
do enact as follows:AB1072,13Section 1. 346.70 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1072,2,124346.70 (1) Immediate notice of accident. The operator or occupant of a 5vehicle involved in an accident resulting in injury to or death of any person, any 6damage to state or other government-owned property, except a state or other 7government-owned vehicle, to an apparent extent of $200 or more, or total damage 8to property owned by any one person or to a state or other government-owned 1vehicle to an apparent extent of $1,000 $2,000 or more shall immediately by the 2quickest means of communication give notice of such accident to the police 3department, the sheriff’s department or the traffic department of the county or 4municipality in which the accident occurred or to a state traffic patrol officer. In 5this subsection, “injury” means injury to a person of a physical nature resulting in 6death or the need of first aid or attention by a physician or surgeon, whether or not 7first aid or medical or surgical treatment was actually received; “total damage to 8property owned by one person” means the sum total cost of putting the property 9damaged in the condition it was before the accident, if repair thereof is practical, 10and if not practical, the sum total cost of replacing such property. For purposes of 11this subsection if any property which is damaged is held in a form of joint or 12multiple ownership, the property shall be considered to be owned by one person.AB1072,2,1313